Hawaii statutes.
§171-69 Preference right. Any person
otherwise qualified to take a farm lot shall have preference in any drawing for
farm lots, if the person:

(1) Is a veteran (defined herein as a person who
served in the military forces of the United States during any war between the
United States and any other nation and who was discharged or released therefrom
under conditions other than dishonorable); or

(2) Has, within a period of not longer than five
years prior to the filing of the person's application, been an owner in
possession, or a lessee in possession having an unexpired lease term of more
than one year, of farm premises which were taken by any governmental authority
for any public purpose and who was displaced by reason of the taking or which
became unusable for farm purposes because the use was declared a public
nuisance or was displaced by reason of a natural disaster. [L 1962, c 32, pt of
§2; Supp, §103A-65; HRS §171-69; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next